North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-05.1 Satellite Video Livestock Auction Markets [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 1; 1999, ch. 321, § 7; 2001, ch. 314, § 1; 2013, ch. 261, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-02.
Satellite video livestock auction market and internet auction — Authority to transact business. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 2; 2001, ch. 314, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-03.
Application for license — Contents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 3; 2001, ch. 314, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-04.
Use of fees — Grounds for refusal or revocation of license — Review by court. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 4; 2001, ch. 314, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-05.
Inspection of livestock. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-06.
Method of payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 6; 2001, ch. 314, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-05.1-07.
Sale of livestock by weight — Scales to be inspected. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 428, § 7; 2001, ch. 314, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.